apertium-fra-spa.fra.metadix
    <pardef n="aper/cevoir__vblex">
      <e><p><l>cevaient</l>         <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevais</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevais</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevait</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevant</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevant</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevez</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevez</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cevez</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ceviez</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ceviez</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevions</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevions</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevoir</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevons</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevons</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>cevons</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevra</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevrai</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevraient</l>        <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevrais</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevrais</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevrait</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevras</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevrez</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevriez</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevrions</l>         <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevrons</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>cevront</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çois</l>             <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çois</l>             <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__encimp"/></e>
      <e><p><l>çois</l>             <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çois</l>             <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çoit</l>             <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çoive</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çoive</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çoivent</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çoivent</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çoives</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çu</l>               <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çue</l>              <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çues</l>             <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çurent</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çus</l>              <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çus</l>              <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çus</l>              <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çusse</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çussent</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çusses</l>           <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çussiez</l>          <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çussions</l>         <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çut</l>              <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çûmes</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çût</l>              <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çûtes</l>            <r>cevoir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="apercevoir" a="eleka">           <i>aper</i><par n="aper/cevoir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="concevoir">                      <i>con</i><par n="aper/cevoir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="décevoir">                       <i>dé</i><par n="aper/cevoir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="percevoir" a="eleka">            <i>per</i><par n="aper/cevoir__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="percevoir des biens" a="eleka">  <i>per</i><par n="aper/cevoir__vblex"/><p><l><b/>des<b/>biens</l><r><g><b/>des<b/>biens</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="recevoir">                       <i>re</i><par n="aper/cevoir__vblex"/></e>
